Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.256

Assessments—Roll, hearings, notices, objections, appeal, etc.

The board of trustees in assessing the property within the district and the rights, duties and liabilities of property owners therein shall be governed, insofar as is consistent with this chapter, by the provisions for county road improvement districts as set forth in RCW 36.88.090 through 36.88.110.

[ 1959 c 64 s 8.]